Hawaii statutes.
[§583A-111] Taking testimony in another state. (a) In addition to
other procedures available to a party, a party to a child-custody proceeding
may offer testimony of witnesses who are located in another state, including
testimony of the parties and the child, by deposition or other means allowable
in this State for testimony taken in another state. The court on its own
motion may order that the testimony of a person be taken in another state and
may prescribe the manner in which and the terms upon which the testimony is
taken.

(b) A court of this State may permit an
individual residing in another state to be deposed or to testify by telephone,
audiovisual means, or other electronic means before a designated court or at
another location in that state. A court of this State shall cooperate with
courts of other states in designating an appropriate location for the
deposition or testimony.

(c) Documentary evidence transmitted from
another state to a court of this State by technological means that do not
produce an original writing shall not be excluded from evidence on an objection
based on the means of transmission. [L 2002, c 124, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next